Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2038
False or fraudulent actions; prohibited acts; penalty; denial of benefits.

Any person who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent, presents or causes to be presented a false or fraudulent claim or benefit application, any false or fraudulent proof in support of such a claim or benefit, or false or fraudulent information which would affect a future claim or benefit application to be paid under the retirement system for the purpose of defrauding or attempting to defraud the retirement system shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. The board shall deny any benefits that it determines are based on false or fraudulent information and shall have a cause of action against the officer to recover any benefits already paid on the basis of such information.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 66.